Washington statutes.
RCW 36.29.120

Ex officio collector of other city taxes.

For the purpose of collection of all taxes levied for cities and towns of other than the first class, the county treasurer of the county wherein such city or town is situated shall be ex officio tax collector.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.29.120. Prior: 1893 c 72 s 3; RRS s 11330.]